Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 1. Mortgages.

Collateral references. —

55 Am. Jur. 2d, Mortgages, §§ 345,
346,
360 et seq.

66 Am. Jur. 2d, Records and Recording Laws, §§ 45 et seq., 117,
149 et seq.

59 C.J.S., Mortgages, §§ 248-253, 473-480.

76 C.J.S., Records, §§ 8–20.

Debts included in provision of mortgage purporting to cover all future and existing debts (“Dragnet Clause”) — modern status.
3 ALR4th 690.

Which of conflicting descriptions in deeds or mortgages of fractional quantity of interest intended to be conveyed prevails.
12 ALR4th 795.

Right of mortgagee, who acquires title to mortgaged premises in satisfaction of mortgage, to recover, under fire insurance policy covering him as “mortgagee,” for loss or injury to property thereafter damages or destroyed by fire.
19 ALR4th 778.

What transfers justify acceleration under “due-on-sale” clause of real-estate mortgage.
22 ALR4th 1266.

Mortgagee-lender’s duty, in disbursing funds, to protect mortgagor against outstanding or potential mechanics’ liens against the mortgaged property.
30 ALR4th 134.

Validity and effect of “wraparound” mortgages whereby purchaser incorporates into agreed payments to grantor latter's obligation on initial mortgage. 36 ALR4th 144.

Duty of mortgagee of real property with respect to obtaining or maintenance of fire or other casualty insurance for protection of mortgagor. 42 ALR4th 188.

Validity and enforceability of due-on-sale real-estate mortgage provisions. 61 ALR4th 1070.

Effect of Federal Home Mortgage Disclosure Act of 1975 ( 12 USCS §§ 2801- 2809) on enforcement of state disclosure and antiredlining statutes against federal financial institutions.
57 ALR Fed. 322.

Right of debtor to “de-acceleration” of residential mortgage indebtedness under Chapter 13 of Bankruptcy Code of 1978 ( 11 USCS § 1322(b)).
67 ALR Fed. 217.

Sec. 34.20.010.
Recording assignment of mortgage.

The recording of the assignment of a mortgage is not in itself considered notice of the assignment to the mortgagor or the heirs or personal representatives of the mortgagor, so as to invalidate a payment made by one or more of them to the mortgagee.

History.

(§ 22-3-28 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.20.020.
Discharge of mortgage by entry in margin of record. [Repealed, § 43 ch 161 SLA 1988.]

Sec. 34.20.030.
Recording of discharge upon certificate of mortgagee.

A mortgage may be discharged upon the record of the mortgage by the recorder who has custody of the record when there is presented to the recorder a certificate executed by the mortgagee or the personal representatives or assigns of the mortgagee, acknowledged or proved and certified in the manner prescribed in AS 34.15 to entitle conveyances to be recorded, specifying that the mortgage is paid or otherwise satisfied or discharged.

History.

(§ 22-3-30 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.20.040.
Recording certificate.

A certificate of discharge provided for in AS

34.20.030

and the proof or acknowledgment of the certificate shall be recorded at full length. A reference shall be made to the book and page containing the record of the certificate or the serial number of the record of the certificate in the entry of the discharge of the mortgage made by the recorder upon the record of the discharge.

History.

(§ 22-3-31 ACLA 1949; am § 38 ch 35 SLA 2003)

Sec. 34.20.050.
Penalty for failure to discharge mortgage or execute certificate.

If a mortgagee, or personal representatives, successors in interest or assigns of the mortgagee, after full performance of the condition of the mortgage, whether before or after a breach, for 10 days after being so requested in writing, and after tender of the reasonable charges, neglects or refuses to discharge the mortgage, or to execute and acknowledge a certificate of discharge or release of the mortgage, the mortgagee is liable to the mortgagor, the heirs, successors in interest, representatives or assigns of the mortgagor, in the sum of $300 damages, and also for all damages occasioned by the neglect or refusal.

History.

(§ 22-3-32 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.20.060.
Definition.

In AS

34.20.010

—

34.20.060

, “conveyance” includes every instrument in writing by which an estate or interest in real property is created, alienated, mortgaged, or encumbered, or by which the title to real property is affected, except a will.

History.

(§ 22-3-21 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 9 SLA 1955))